Utah statutes.
54-14-301.   Creation, purpose, and composition of board.

(1)  The Utility Facility Review Board is created within the Department of Commerce to resolve disputes between local governments and public utilities regarding the siting and construction of facilities as provided in this part.

(2)  The board shall be composed of:

(a)  the three members of the commission;

(b)  an individual appointed by the governor from a list of nominees of the Utah League of Cities and Towns; and

(c)  an individual appointed by the governor from a list of nominees of the Utah Association of Counties.

(3)  The chair of the commission shall serve as chair of the board.

(4)  Members of the commission shall serve as members of the board during their terms of office as commissioners and until their successors on the commission have been appointed and taken office.

(5) (a)  Members of the board who are not commissioners:

(i)  shall have four-year terms, except the initial term of the individual first appointed by the governor from nominees of the Utah Association of Counties shall be two years;

(ii)  may be appointed for one succeeding term; and

(iii)  may continue to serve until their successor takes office.

(b)  Vacancies in the board of members who are not commissioners shall be filled for the unexpired term.

(6)  Three members of the board constitute a quorum.

(7)  A member of the board may be removed for cause by the governor.

(8)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

